Washington statutes.
RCW 36.160.030

Cultural access program—Creation.

(1) Any county legislative authority may create a cultural access program by ordinance.

(2) Any contiguous group of counties may create a program by entering into an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW, approved by resolution of the county legislative authorities.

(3) A city may create a cultural access program if the county legislative authority in which the city is located adopts a resolution stating that the county forfeits its option to create a program or does not place a proposition before the people to create such a program by June 30, 2017. In the event the exception in this subsection occurs, all references in this chapter to a county must include a city that has exercised its authority under this subsection, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 301.]

NOTES:

Construction—2015 3rd sp.s. c 24: "The provisions of this act must be liberally construed to effectuate the policies and purposes of this act." [ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 804.]